Illinois, session 104th, SB2988.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.62 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.62)7    Sec. 356z.62. Coverage of preventive health services.8    (a) A policy of group health insurance coverage or 9individual health insurance coverage as defined in Section 5 10of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability and 11Accountability Act shall, at a minimum, provide coverage for 12and shall not impose any cost-sharing requirements, including 13a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible, for:14        (1) evidence-based items or services that have in 15    effect a rating of "A" or "B" in the current 16    recommendations of the United States Preventive Services 17    Task Force;18        (2) immunizations that have in effect a recommendation 19    from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of 20    the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with 21    respect to the individual involved;22        (3) with respect to infants, children, and 23    adolescents, evidence-informed preventive care and   SB2988- 2 -LRB104 17962 BAB 31399 b1    screenings provided for in the comprehensive guidelines 2    supported by the Health Resources and Services 3    Administration;4        (4) with respect to women, such additional preventive 5    care and screenings not described in paragraph (1) of this 6    subsection (a) as provided for in comprehensive guidelines 7    supported by the Health Resources and Services 8    Administration for purposes of this paragraph; and9        (5) immunizations and medical countermeasures that 10    have in effect a recommendation within the State 11    Guidelines for Communicable Disease Prevention issued by 12    the Director of Public Health pursuant to Section 1.2 of 13    the Communicable Disease Prevention Act, with respect to 14    the individual involved. For this paragraph, the 15    prohibition on cost-sharing requirements does not apply if 16    and to the extent that the coverage would disqualify a 17    high-deductible health plan from eligibility for a health 18    savings account pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal 19    Revenue Code; and . 20        (6) spinal examinations for scoliosis. 21    (b) For purposes of this Section, and for purposes of any 22other provision of State law, recommendations of the United 23States Preventive Services Task Force regarding breast cancer 24screening, mammography, and prevention issued in or around 25November 2009 are not considered to be current.26    (c) For office visits:  SB2988- 3 -LRB104 17962 BAB 31399 b1        (1) if an item or service described in subsection (a) 2    is billed separately or is tracked as individual encounter 3    data separately from an office visit, then a policy may 4    impose cost-sharing requirements with respect to the 5    office visit;6        (2) if an item or service described in subsection (a) 7    is not billed separately or is not tracked as individual 8    encounter data separately from an office visit and the 9    primary purpose of the office visit is the delivery of 10    such an item or service, then a policy may not impose 11    cost-sharing requirements with respect to the office 12    visit; and13        (3) if an item or service described in subsection (a) 14    is not billed separately or is not tracked as individual 15    encounter data separately from an office visit and the 16    primary purpose of the office visit is not the delivery of 17    such an item or service, then a policy may impose 18    cost-sharing requirements with respect to the office 19    visit.20    (d) A policy must provide coverage pursuant to subsection 21(a) for plan or policy years that begin on or after the date 22that is one year after the date the recommendation or 23guideline is issued. If a recommendation or guideline is in 24effect on the first day of the plan or policy year, or if a 25recommendation becomes effective for an in-force policy under 26the circumstances described in subsection (d-5), the policy   SB2988- 4 -LRB104 17962 BAB 31399 b1shall cover the items and services specified in the 2recommendation or guideline through the last day of the plan 3or policy year unless either:4        (1) a recommendation under paragraph (1) of subsection 5    (a) is downgraded to a "D" rating; or6        (2) the item or service is subject to a safety recall 7    or is otherwise determined to pose a significant safety 8    concern by a federal agency authorized to regulate the 9    item or service during the plan or policy year.10    (d-5) Notwithstanding subsection (d), a policy, including 11an in-force policy, must provide coverage pursuant to 12paragraph (5) of subsection (a) within 15 business days after 13the date the State Guidelines for Communicable Disease 14Prevention are issued if the Guidelines reinstate any 15recommendation or portion thereof under paragraph (2) of 16subsection (a) that the Advisory Committee on Immunization 17Practices has reduced or withdrawn. 18    (e) Network limitations.19        (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 20    nothing in this Section requires coverage for items or 21    services described in subsection (a) that are delivered by 22    an out-of-network provider under a health maintenance 23    organization health care plan, other than a 24    point-of-service contract, or under a voluntary health 25    services plan that generally excludes coverage for 26    out-of-network services except as otherwise required by   SB2988- 5 -LRB104 17962 BAB 31399 b1    law.2        (2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, 3    nothing in this Section precludes a policy with a 4    preferred provider program under Article XX-1/2 of this 5    Code, a health maintenance organization point-of-service 6    contract, or a similarly designed voluntary health 7    services plan from imposing cost-sharing requirements for 8    items or services described in subsection (a) that are 9    delivered by an out-of-network provider.10        (3) If a policy does not have in its network a provider 11    who can provide an item or service described in subsection 12    (a), then the policy must cover the item or service when 13    performed by an out-of-network provider and it may not 14    impose cost-sharing with respect to the item or service.15    (f) Nothing in this Section prevents a company from using 16reasonable medical management techniques to determine the 17frequency, method, treatment, or setting for an item or 18service described in subsection (a) to the extent not 19specified in the recommendation or guideline.20    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 21a policy from providing coverage for items or services in 22addition to those required under subsection (a) or from 23denying coverage for items or services that are not required 24under subsection (a). Unless prohibited by other law, a policy 25may impose cost-sharing requirements for a treatment not 26described in subsection (a) even if the treatment results from   SB2988- 6 -LRB104 17962 BAB 31399 b1an item or service described in subsection (a). Nothing in 2this Section shall be construed to limit coverage requirements 3provided under other law.4    (h) The Director may develop guidelines to permit a 5company to utilize value-based insurance designs. In the 6absence of guidelines developed by the Director, any such 7guidelines developed by the Secretary of the U.S. Department 8of Health and Human Services that are in force under 42 U.S.C. 9300gg-13 shall apply.10    (i) For student health insurance coverage as defined at 45 11CFR 147.145, student administrative health fees are not 12considered cost-sharing requirements with respect to 13preventive services specified under subsection (a). As used in 14this subsection, "student administrative health fee" means a 15fee charged by an institution of higher education on a 16periodic basis to its students to offset the cost of providing 17health care through health clinics regardless of whether the 18students utilize the health clinics or enroll in student 19health insurance coverage.20    (j) For any recommendation or guideline specifically 21referring to women or men, a company shall not deny or limit 22the coverage required or a claim made under subsection (a) 23based solely on the individual's recorded sex or actual or 24perceived gender identity, or for the reason that the 25individual is gender nonconforming, intersex, transgender, or 26has undergone, or is in the process of undergoing, gender   SB2988- 7 -LRB104 17962 BAB 31399 b1transition, if, notwithstanding the sex or gender assigned at 2birth, the covered individual meets the conditions for the 3recommendation or guideline at the time the item or service is 4furnished.5    (k) This Section does not apply to grandfathered health 6plans, excepted benefits, or short-term, limited-duration 7health insurance coverage.8(Source: P.A. 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 104-439, eff. 12-2-25.)